Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,226
Forcible entry and detainer; trial without jury; judgment; restitution; costs.

If the suit is not continued or the place of trial changed, or if neither party demands a jury, the court shall try the cause. If, after hearing the evidence, the court shall conclude that the complaint is not true, the court shall enter judgment against the plaintiff for costs. If the court shall find that the complaint is true, judgment shall be entered against the defendant and in favor of the plaintiff for restitution of the premises and costs of suit. If the court shall find that the complaint is true in part, judgment shall be entered for the restitution of such part only, and the costs shall be taxed as the court shall deem just and equitable.

Laws 1929, c. 82, § 125, p. 311;

C.S.1929, § 22-1209;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,126;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 76;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-576.

This section pertains specifically to a cause of action for forcible entry and detainer; it does not inhibit any right to trial by jury that would otherwise arise incident to other causes of action. 132 Ventures v. Active Spine Physical Therapy, 313 Neb. 45, 982 N.W.2d 778 (2022).